Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2161
Writ; endorsement of allowance; service; neglect to return; penalty.

The allowance of the writ must be endorsed thereon, signed by a judge of the court granting it, and the writ must be served personally upon the defendant. If the defendant duly served neglects to return the same, he shall be proceeded against, as for a contempt.

R.S.1867, Code § 650, p. 508;

R.S.1913, § 8276;

C.S.1922, § 9229;

C.S.1929, § 20-2161;

R.S.1943, § 25-2161.

This section does not authorize judge to issue writ. Clerk of district court issues writ, authenticated by seal of the court. State ex rel. Hansen v. Carrico, 86 Neb. 448, 125 N.W. 1110 (1910).